Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 6
EXPERIMENT STATIONS

23-31-601. Acceptance of congressional act of 1862.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification, and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to all of the provisions, terms, grants, and conditions and purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the colleges established in the several states, under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and of the acts supplementary thereto".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-101 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-602. Control of fund.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the control of the fund appropriated by the said act of congress and shall disburse the same for the use and benefit of the agricultural experiment station department of the Colorado state university in accordance with the terms and provisions of said act of congress.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-102 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-603. Acceptance of congressional act of 1906.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification, and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to all the provisions, terms, grants, and conditions and purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to provide for an increased annual appropriation for agricultural experiment stations and regulate the expenditure thereof", approved March 16, 1906.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-103 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-604. Board to control fund.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the control of the fund appropriated by the said act of congress and shall disburse the same for the use and benefit of the agricultural experiment station department of the Colorado state university in accordance with the terms and provisions of said act of congress.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-104 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-605. Board to cooperate with counties.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is authorized to cooperate with the several counties of the state in research work and in investigations of matters pertaining to the agricultural and industrial development of the counties and state upon such terms and in such manner as may be mutually agreed upon by the respective boards of county commissioners and the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 542, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-105 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-606. Employees and specialists.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is vested with the power to employ and to discharge, as in its opinion the interests of the service require, all employees and specialists engaged to carry out the provisions of this section and section 23-31-605.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 542, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-106 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-607. Stations established.

For the furtherance and promotion of the agricultural interests of this state, agricultural experimental stations are established. The precise locations shall be determined as provided in section 23-31-608.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 542, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-107 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-608. Board to secure lands.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is authorized to select the necessary lands, secure the same either by lease or purchase, make all necessary improvements in the way of buildings and fences, and take such steps as it deems necessary to successfully establish said stations.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 542, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-108 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-609. Board to supervise.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the control and supervision of said station. It shall appoint a superintendent and such other officers and employees as necessary to carry on the said station successfully. It shall have power to fix salaries and all compensation of employees and is empowered to fix such rules and regulations necessary for the successful attainment of the object for which said station is established and maintained. It shall also appoint three resident trustees who shall act without compensation; except that, when it becomes necessary, they may be allowed traveling expenses in attending to the discharge of their duties.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 542, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-109 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-610. Objects of stations.

The object of the agricultural experimental stations is to determine the adaptability of crops of grain, grasses, root crops, and all other growths which may grow in this latitude and the most economical method of producing the best results in growing such crops with and without irrigation.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 542, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-110 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-611. Proceeds from station.

The proceeds arising from the sale of products of agricultural experimental stations shall be applied in the liquidation of the running expenses. All moneys so accruing shall be credited as coming from the state and applied as part or whole payment of any amount which may be appropriated from the funds of the state for the maintenance of the stations.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 543, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-111 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-612. Expenses - how paid.

To enable the board of governors of the Colorado state university system to carry out the provisions of sections 23-31-607 to 23-31-612, it is authorized to expend such amount as it may deem necessary in establishing agricultural experimental stations, out of any moneys which may accrue to the state by action of the congress of the United States for the purpose of establishing agricultural experimental stations in the various states and territories of the United States.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 543, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-33-112 as it existed prior to 2007.